Connecticut, session 2026, HB05322.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a
working group regarding endometriosis for the purpose of evaluating
and making recommendations regarding the diagnosis, treatment,
research, education and public awareness of endometriosis in the state.
The working group shall be within the Legislative Department. The
working group shall evaluate the following:
(1) The prevalence and impact of endometriosis on residents of the
state;
(2) Barriers to timely and accurate diagnosis of endometriosis;
(3) Access to evidence-based treatment for endometriosis, including,
but not limited to, medical, surgical and therapeutic interventions;
(4) Insurance coverage and reimbursement practices for the
treatment of endometriosis;
(5) The impact of endometriosis in the workplace, including, but not
limited to, leave, accommodations and employment protections;
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5322
(6) Gaps in public and provider education and training concerning
endometriosis; and
(7) Opportunities to improve endometriosis data collection, research
initiatives and patient outcomes.
(b) The working group shall consist of the following members, who
shall be appointed not later than thirty days after the effective date of
this section:
(1) Four appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
one of whom shall be a member of the House or Representatives, one of
whom shall be a physician licensed pursuant to chapter 370 of the
general statutes with demonstrated experience in the diagnosis and
treatment of endometriosis, one of whom shall be a representative of a
federally qualified health center and one of whom shall be an individual
residing in the state who has been diagnosed with endometriosis;
(2) Four appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate, one of
whom shall be a member of the Senate, one of whom shall be a physician
licensed pursuant to chapter 370 of the general statutes who is a member
of the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, one of
whom shall be a researcher affiliated with an academic or research
institution in the state with expertise in endometriosis and one of whom
shall be a patient advocate with experience advocating on behalf of
individuals with endometriosis;
(3) Four appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives, one of whom shall be a member of the House of
Representatives, one of whom shall be a pediatric or an adolescent
medicine physician licensed pursuant to chapter 370 of the general
statutes and currently practicing in the state, one of whom shall be an
individual in the state with expertise in racial and health equity or who
represents a community-based organization serving historically
underserved populations and one of whom shall be a representative of
an association of hospitals in the state or an administrator of a hospital
in the state;
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5322
(4) Four appointed by the minority leader of the Senate, one of whom
shall be a member of the Senate, one of whom shall be a representative
of a school-based health center in the state, one of whom shall be a
representative of a therapeutic or pharmaceutical manufacturer with
experience in treatments related to endometriosis and one of whom
shall be an individual residing in the state who has been diagnosed with
endometriosis;
(5) The Commissioner of Public Health, or the commissioner's
designee;
(6) The Insurance Commissioner, or the commissioner's designee;
and
(7) The cochairpersons of the endometriosis data and biorepository
program established pursuant to section 10a-132f of the general statutes.
(c) Except for members of the General Assembly, members who
represent state agencies and the cochairpersons of the endometriosis
data and biorepository program, six of the members first appointed
shall serve for a term of two years, six of such members shall serve for a
term of three years and, thereafter, members shall serve for a term of
two years. The executive director of the Commission on Women,
Children, Seniors, Equity and Opportunity shall determine which of the
members first appointed shall serve for a term of two years and which
of such members shall serve for a term of three years. Any vacancy shall
be filled by the appointing authority not later than thirty calendar days
after the appointment becomes vacant. Any member previously
appointed to the working group may be reappointed. The members of
the working group shall receive no compensation for their services but
may be reimbursed for any necessary expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties.
(d) The administrative staff of the Commission on Women, Children,
Seniors, Equity and Opportunity shall serve as administrative staff of
the working group. The executive director of said commission shall
schedule the first meeting of the working group which shall be held not
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5322
later than sixty days after the effective date of this section. The working
group shall appoint a chairperson and vice-chairperson from among its
members at its first meeting. The working group shall meet not less than
quarterly and provide an opportunity for public comment at its
meetings.
(e) Not later than January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the
working group shall report to the Governor and, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to human services and public health regarding its evaluation
and recommendations, including, but not limited to, for legislation
necessary to implement any of such recommendations.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
PH Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4